Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4710
Department; report; contents.

The department shall document in the report pursuant to subsection (3) of section 43-285 the steps the department is taking to ensure that:

(1) The child’s caregiver is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard;

(2) The child has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age or developmentally appropriate activities;

(3) The department has consulted with the child in an age or developmentally appropriate manner about the opportunities of the child to participate in age or developmentally appropriate activities; and

(4) Any barriers to participation in age or developmentally appropriate activities are identified and addressed.

Laws 2016, LB746, § 10.